Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2317
County funds; depositories; form of bond; ineligible sureties.

The bond in substance shall be similar to the bond required and set forth in section 77-2304. No person in any way connected with any depository bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution as an officer or stockholder shall be accepted as a surety on any bond given by the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution of which he or she is an officer or stockholder.

Laws 1891, c. 50, § 8, p. 352;

Laws 1897, c. 23, § 5, p. 191;

Laws 1903, c. 110, § 2, p. 585;

Laws 1909, c. 35, § 1, p. 216;

R.S.1913, § 6662;

C.S.1922, § 6193;

Laws 1925, c. 96, § 1, p. 279;

Laws 1927, c. 34, § 2, p. 156;

Laws 1929, c. 36, § 1, p. 151;

C.S.1929, § 77-2508;

Laws 1935, c. 152, § 4, p. 563;

Laws 1939, c. 103, § 3, p. 464;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2508;

R.S.1943, § 77-2317;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 35;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 29;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 37.